Hawaii statutes.
§286-4.1 Medical advisory board.
(a) There is established within the office of the state director of
transportation for administrative purposes a medical advisory board consisting
of not fewer than five physicians licensed to practice in the State. The
members of the board shall be appointed by the governor as provided in section
26-34, except as otherwise provided by this section. The board shall consist
of physicians with an interest in one or more of the following:

(1) Psychiatry;

(2) Neurology;

(3) Orthopedics;

(4) Ophthalmology or optometry;

(5) Endocrinology;

(6) Geriatrics; or

(7) Addiction medicine.

The members of the board shall serve without
compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expense,
actually incurred in the performance of their duties under this chapter.

(b) The duties of the board shall include:

(1) The development of a system for medically
evaluating persons who an examiner of drivers has reason to believe have mental
or physical conditions that might impair their driving ability; and

(2) The furnishing of advice to the examiners of
drivers respecting medical criteria and vision standards for motor vehicle
drivers. [L 1969, c 128, §1(4); am L 1970, c 164, §3; am L Sp 1977 1st, c 20,
§12; am L 1991, c 128, §1; am L 2016, c 120, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next